North Carolina statutes. Chapter 43. Land Registration.
Article 2. Officers and Fees. [Repealed]

§ 43-4.
Examiners appointed by clerk.

The clerk of the superior court of each county shall appoint three or more examiners of titles, who shall be licensed attorneys-at-law, residing in the State of North Carolina. They shall qualify by taking oath before the clerk to faithfully discharge the duties of such office, which oath shall be filed in the office of the clerk. The term of office shall be two years. Examiners of titles shall have and exercise the jurisdiction and perform the duties hereinafter prescribed, and receive the fees herein provided. They shall not appear in or have any connection with any proceeding instituted under the provisions of this Chapter, and they shall be subject to removal at will by such clerk or judge of the superior court.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 3; 1917, c. 63; C.S., s. 2380.

§ 43-5.
Fees of officers.

The examiner provided for in

G.S. 43-4

shall be compensated as provided in

G.S. 1-408

. All plats required by this Chapter shall comply with

G.S. 47-30

and shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds, and the recording fee shall be that specified in

G.S. 161-10

for recording plats. The fee for recording new certificates under this Chapter shall be that specified in

G.S. 161-10

for recording instruments in general. The fee for issuing the certificate and new certificates under this Chapter shall be that specified in G.S. 161-10 for issuing certified copies. The fee for noting the entries or memorandum required and for the entries noting the cancellation of mortgages and all other entries, if any, herein provided for shall be that specified in G.S. 161-10 for recording instruments in general.

There shall be no other fees allowed of any nature except as herein provided, and the bonds of the register and clerk shall be liable in case of any mistake, malfeasance, or misfeasance as to the duties imposed upon them by this Chapter in as full a manner as such bond is now liable by law.

History.

1913, c. 90, s. 30; C.S., s. 2381; 1971, c. 1185, s. 1; 1977, c. 774; 1999-59, s. 1.